src/fst/stems/adverbs.lexc
LEXICON adverbs
вадриʼ+Adv:вадʼ ADV-MANNER_  "vähitellen" ;
вапекариˮ+Adv:вапекариˮ ADV-MANNER_  "liian heikosti" ;
вареˮ≈+Adv:варе ADV-REF_Д1  "hädin tuskin" ;
варехэˮ≈+Adv:варехэ ADV-REF_Д1  "hädin tuskin" ;
варехэта+Adv:варета ADV-MANNER_  "hädin tuskin" ;
ватамбойʼ+Adv:ватамбойʼ ADV-MANNER_  "liikaa" ;
вэʼ+Adv:вэʼ ADV-MANNER_  "huonosti" ;
вэльңэ+Adv:вэльңэ ADV-MANNER_  "yksitellen" ;
енаˮмасиˮ+Adv:енаˮмасиˮ ADV-MANNER_  "epäluotettavasti" ;
есясиˮ+Adv:есясиˮ ADV-MANNER_  "rahattomasti" ;
еңгалё+Adv:еңгалёко ADV-MANNER_  "jäljekkäin" ;
ибясавэйʼ+Adv:ибясавэйʼ ADV-MANNER_  "liimalla" ;
иртˮ+Adv:иртˮ ADV-LOC_  "suoraan" ;
иртариˮ+Adv:иртариˮ ADV-LOC_  "suoraan" ;
ирэхэˮна+Adv:ирэˮна ADV-MANNER_  "rinnalla" ;
итревʼ+Adv:итревʼ ADV-MANNER_  "kuten vesi" ;
лаˮамдярциˮ+Adv:лаˮмадициˮ ADV-MANNER_  "kärsimättömästi" ;
лабтˮ+Adv:лабцˮ ADV-MANNER_  "ketterästi" ;
лакриʼ+Adv:лакриʼ ADV-MANNER_  "äkkiä" ;
лакривна+Adv:лакариковна ADV-MANNER_  "äkkiä" ;
лэтңганзо+Adv:лэтңганзо ADV-MANNER_  "varalle" ;
малициˮ+Adv:малициˮ ADV-MANNER_  "ahnaasti" ;
малсиˮ+Adv:малсиˮ ADV-MANNER_  "loputtomasti" ;
малха≈+Adv:малха ADV-REF_  "loppuun" ;
манта≈+Adv:манта ADV-REF_  "henkilökohtaisesti" ;
марнасиˮ+Adv:марнасиˮ ADV-MANNER_  "äänettömästi" ;
маханяд+Adv:маханяд ADV-LOC_  "oikealta" ;
маханяна+Adv:маханяна ADV-LOC_  "oikeallа" ;
мербявна+Adv:мербявна ADV-TEMP_  "pikapuolin" ;
мербяривна+Adv:мербяривна ADV-TEMP_  "kohta" ;
мервана+Adv:мерувна ADV-TEMP_  "pikaisesti" ;
меркуʼ+Adv:меркоʼ ADV-TEMP_  "nopeammin" ;
мертявна+Adv:мертявна ADV-TEMP_  "kiireisesti" ;
миды+Adv:мэды ADV-MANNER_  "jos tosiaan" ;
минри≈+Adv:минри ADV-REF_  "kohta" ;
минханда+Adv:минханда ADV-TEMP_  "heti" ;
минха≈+Adv:минха ADV-REF_  "heti" ;
мунзерʼ+Adv:мунзерʼ ADV-MANNER_  "tottelevainen" ;
наңадяха≈+Adv:наңадяха ADV-REF_  "kokonaan" ;
невхына+Adv:невхына ADV-TEMP_  "aikaisemmin" ;
неновна+Adv:неновна ADV-MANNER_  "oikeasti" ;
ненхана≈+Adv:ненхана ADV-REF_  "vihapäissään" ;
нерˮ+Adv:нерˮ ADV-TEMP_  "aikaisemmin" ;
нерибтеʼ+Adv:нерибтеʼ ADV-TEMP_  "alussa" ;
нерняʼ+Adv:нерняʼ ADV-LOC_  "eteen" ;
нири≈+Adv:нири ADV-REF_  "armottomasti" ;
нулңгавасиˮ+Adv:нулңгавасиˮ ADV-MANNER_  "pysähtymättä" ;
нюлкавна+Adv:нюлкавна ADV-MANNER_  "pehmeästi" ;
нюрибтеʼ+Adv:нюрибтеʼ ADV-TEMP_  "aluksi" ;
нюртейʼ+Adv:нюртейʼ ADV-TEMP_  "ensimmäistä kertaa" ;
нябтипойˮ+Adv:нябтипойˮ ADV-LOC_  "aika lähellä" ;
нянзиковна+Adv:нянзиковна ADV-MANNER_  "ohuesti" ;
нярмбыхы≈+Adv:нярмбыхы ADV-REF_  "punaiseksi" ;
паркасиˮ+Adv:паркасиˮ ADV-MANNER_  "alasti" ;
пилиˮ+Adv:пилиˮ ADV-TEMP_  "aina" ;
пиняʼ+Adv:пиняʼ ADV-LOC_  "ulos" ;
пинякуна+Adv:пинякуна ADV-LOC_  "takana" ;
пирасʼ+Adv:пирасʼ ADV-TEMP_  "yhtäaikaisesti" ;
пиркана+Adv:пиркана ADV-TEMP_  "kuluttua" ;
пирсакоʼ+Adv:пирсакоʼ ADV-LOC_  "lähekkäin" ;
писянзиˮ+Adv:писянзиˮ ADV-MANNER_  "nauraamatta" ;
понаркаʼ+Adv:понаркаʼ ADV-TEMP_  "aika kauan" ;
пондэйʼ+Adv:пондэйʼ ADV-TEMP_  "kauan" ;
понкуркаʼ+Adv:понкуркаʼ ADV-TEMP_  "kauemmin" ;
пуцейʼ+Adv:пуцейʼ ADV-TEMP_  "myöhemmin" ;
пэвсюмбʼ+Adv:пэвсюмбʼ ADV-TEMP_  "illalla" ;
пэвсюмняна+Adv:пэсьняна ADV-TEMP_  "illalla" ;
сававна+Adv:сававна ADV-MANNER_  "hyvin" ;
сейсиˮ+Adv:сейсиˮ ADV-MANNER_  "sydämmettömänä" ;
сеняна+Adv:сеняняна ADV-LOC_  "aiemmin" ;
серкаˮ≈+Adv:серка ADV-REF_Д1  "yksin" ;
сидяңэ+Adv:сидяңэ ADV-MANNER_  "kaksin" ;
сикна≈+Adv:сикна ADV-REF_  "kuvaillen" ;
синя≈+Adv:синя ADV-REF_  "silti" ;
сэдˮ+Adv:сэдˮ ADV-MANNER_  "vinoon" ;
сяˮнэмбохона≈+Adv:сяˮнэмбохона ADV-REF_  "kuinka nopeasti" ;
сяˮня+Adv:сяˮня ADV-TEMP_  "milloin" ;
сяниˮ+Adv:сяниˮ ADV-MANNER_  "eri-" ;
сятаняд+Adv:сятаняд ADV-LOC_  "vasemmalta" ;
сятаняна+Adv:сятаняна ADV-LOC_  "vasemmalla" ;
сяхаʼ+Adv:сяхаʼ ADV-TEMP_  "milloin" ;
сяхабтаʼ+Adv:сябтаʼ ADV-TEMP_  "hetkessä" ;
сяхаңгаваʼ+Adv:сяхаңгаваʼ ADV-TEMP_  "joskus" ;
сяхаңгартʼ+Adv:сяхартʼ ADV-TEMP_  "ei koskaan" ;
сяˮнэмбохона≈+Adv:сяˮнэмбохона ADV-REF_  "miten nopeasti" ;
таˮляʼ+Adv:таляʼ ADV-LOC_  "tänne" ;
таˮляна+Adv:таˮляна ADV-LOC_  "täällä" ;
тад+Adv:тад ADV-TEMP_  "sitten" ;
тадикахад+Adv:тадикэхэд ADV-TEMP_  "sen jälkeen" ;
тайна+Adv:тайна ADV-LOC_  "tuolla" ;
тальня+Adv:тальня ADV-TEMP_  "myöhemmin" ;
тальцюʼ+Adv:тальцюʼ ADV-LOC_  "lähemmäs" ;
тандаяʼ+Adv:тандаяʼ ADV-TEMP_  "juuri" ;
таняʼ+Adv:таняʼ ADV-LOC_  "sinne" ;
танямна+Adv:танямна ADV-LOC_  "sitä kautta" ;
таняна+Adv:тэйняна ADV-LOC_  "siellä" ;
таняңгахаˮна+Adv:таняңгахаˮна ADV-TEMP_  "harvoin" ;
таня≈+Adv:таня ADV-REF_  "silti" ;
тасимна+Adv:тасимна ADV-LOC_  "alitse" ;
тасиняд+Adv:тасиняд ADV-LOC_  "alhaalta" ;
тасиняна+Adv:тасиняна ADV-LOC_  "alhaalla" ;
тахаˮ+Adv:тахаˮ ADV-LOC_  "eri puoliin" ;
тахаби+Adv:тахабя ADV-MANNER_  "mutta nyt" ;
тахат+Adv:тахат ADV-LOC_  "eri paikoista" ;
теˮня+Adv:теˮня ADV-TEMP_  "silloin" ;
тедаʼ+Adv:тедаʼ ADV-TEMP_  "nyt" ;
тедахаваʼ+Adv:тедахаваʼ ADV-TEMP_  "nythän" ;
тенадʼ+Adv:тенадʼ ADV-TEMP_  "tähän saakka" ;
теняна+Adv:теняна ADV-TEMP_  "eilen" ;
тидпойˮ+Adv:тидпойˮ ADV-LOC_  "suoraan" ;
тикад+Adv:тикад ADV-LOC_  "sieltä" ;
тикана+Adv:тикана ADV-LOC_  "siellä" ;
тикана+Adv:тикэхэна ADV-LOC_  "siellä" ;
тикахад+Adv:тикэхэд ADV-LOC_  "sieltä" ;
тикырихина+Adv:тикырихина ADV-TEMP_  "heti" ;
то≈+Adv:то ADV-REF_  "molemmat" ;
тэбала+Adv:тэбала ADV-MANNER_  "harvoin" ;
тюˮуʼ+Adv:тюʼ ADV-LOC_  "ylöspäin" ;
тюˮуд+Adv:тюˮуд ADV-LOC_  "ylhäältä" ;
тюˮуна+Adv:тюна ADV-LOC_  "ylhäällä" ;
тюˮурина+Adv:тюˮурина ADV-LOC_  "ylhäällä" ;
тюконʼ+Adv:тюконʼ ADV-LOC_  "tänne" ;
тюкоход+Adv:тюкод ADV-LOC_  "täältä" ;
тюкохона+Adv:тюкона ADV-LOC_  "täällä" ;
тюкумбоʼ+Adv:тюкумбоʼ ADV-TEMP_  "tänä vuonna" ;
тянёхорт+Adv:тянёхорт ADV-MANNER_  "ollenkaan" ;
хаˮли≈+Adv:хаˮли ADV-REF_  "vain itse" ;
хадёсиˮ+Adv:хадёнзиˮ ADV-MANNER_  "ilman vahingotta" ;
ханзосиˮ+Adv:ханзосиˮ ADV-MANNER_  "heikosti" ;
ханяна+Adv:ханяна ADV-LOC_  "missä" ;
ханяхавамна+Adv:ханяхавамна ADV-LOC_  "jotakin kautta" ;
ханяхавахана+Adv:ханяхавахана ADV-LOC_  "jossakin" ;
ханяхартахана+Adv:ханяхартахана ADV-LOC_  "ei missään" ;
ханяңэхэˮна+Adv:ханяңэхэˮна ADV-TEMP_  "joskus" ;
харˮ≈+Adv:хар ADV-REF_Д1  "itse" ;
харвабаˮ≈+Adv:харваба ADV-REF_Д1  "vaikka" ;
хареˮ≈+Adv:харе ADV-REF_Д1  "itsekse-" ;
хахая+Adv:хахая ADV-LOC_  "lähellä" ;
хубтарка+Adv:хубтарка ADV-LOC_  "vähän kaukana" ;
хувʼ+Adv:хувʼ ADV-TEMP_  "aamulla" ;
худңганзуʼ+Adv:худңганзуʼ ADV-MANNER_  "jotenkuten" ;
хунаданя+Adv:хунаданя ADV-LOC_  "siellä täällä" ;
хунатʼ+Adv:хунатʼ ADV-TEMP_  "pitkään" ;
хунахартад+Adv:хунахартад ADV-LOC_  "ei mistään" ;
хуняна+Adv:хуняна ADV-TEMP_  "huomenna" ;
хуримна+Adv:хурина ADV-LOC_  "kaikkiaalla" ;
хусей+Adv:хусей ADV-MANNER_  "ei ainoastaan" ;
хухуртʼ+Adv:хултʼ ADV-LOC_  "ei mihinkään" ;
хэвʼ+Adv:хэвʼ ADV-TEMP_  "lyhyesti" ;
хэвдэхэд+Adv:хэвдэхэд ADV-LOC_  "sivusta" ;
юнсиˮ+Adv:юнсиˮ ADV-MANNER_  "ilman viestiä" ;
яˮли≈+Adv:яˮли ADV-REF_  "yksin" ;
ябтийвана+Adv:ябтийвана ADV-MANNER_  "lujasti" ;
ядха≈+Adv:ядха ADV-REF_  "itse asiassa" ;
яла≈+Adv:яла ADV-REF_  "yksin" ;
ялри≈+Adv:ялри ADV-REF_  "yksin" ;
ялэˮ+Adv:ялэˮ ADV-TEMP_  "päivittäin" ;
ялэˮ+Adv:ялэˮмана ADV-TEMP_  "päivittäin" ;
ялявна+Adv:ялявна ADV-MANNER_  "kirkkaasti" ;
яндахаˮ+Adv:яндахаˮ ADV-LOC_  "kaikkialle" ;
яносарка+Adv:яносарка ADV-TEMP_  "myöhemmin" ;
яңорʼ+Adv:яңорʼ ADV-MANNER_  "uudestaan" ;
ңабца≈+Adv:ңабца ADV-REF_  "sopivasti" ;
ңавхат+Adv:ңавхат ADV-TEMP_  "vanhastaan" ;
ңаданʼ+Adv:ңаданʼ ADV-LOC_  "kauas" ;
ңадьбя≈+Adv:ңадьбя ADV-REF_  "siksi" ;
ңамгэмбирувна+Adv:ңамгэмбирувна ADV-MANNER_  "millä hinnalla?" ;
ңариˮ+Adv:ңариˮ ADV-TEMP_  "aivan" ;
ңарха≈+Adv:ңарха ADV-REF_  "täysin" ;
ңахат+Adv:ңахат ADV-LOC_  "kaukaa" ;
ңобˮмэсь+Adv:ңобˮмэсь ADV-MANNER_  "yksi toisensa jälkeen" ;
ңобпиняʼ+Adv:ңобпиняʼ ADV-TEMP_  "jatkuvasti" ;
ңобтʼ+Adv:ңобтʼ ADV-MANNER_  "yhdessä" ;
ңодьри≈+Adv:ңодьри ADV-REF_  "hädin tuskin" ;
ңокха≈+Adv:ңокха ADV-REF_  "yhteensä" ;
ңопориңэ+Adv:ңопориңэ ADV-MANNER_  "yksikseen" ;
ңоякʼ+Adv:ңоякʼ ADV-TEMP_  "harvoin" ;
ңэлиривна+Adv:ңэлиривна ADV-MANNER_  "epätavallisesti" ;
ңэрёʼ+Adv:ңэрёʼ ADV-TEMP_  "syksyllä" ;
ңэсо≈+Adv:ңэсо ADV-REF_  "siltään" ;
